Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 6. PUBLIC OFFICERS AND EMPLOYEES

SUBTITLE B. STATE OFFICERS AND EMPLOYEES

CHAPTER 672. EMPLOYMENT PREFERENCE FOR FORMER FOSTER CHILDREN

Sec. 672.001. DEFINITION. In this chapter, "state agency" means a department, commission, board, office, or other agency in the executive branch of state government created by the state constitution or a state statute, including an institution of higher education as defined by Section 61.003, Education Code.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1116 (H.B. 1043), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 672.002. EMPLOYMENT PREFERENCE. (a) An individual who was under the permanent managing conservatorship of the Department of Family and Protective Services on the day preceding the individual's 18th birthday is entitled to a preference in employment with a state agency over other applicants for the same position who do not have a greater qualification.

(b) This chapter does not apply to:

(1) the position of private secretary or deputy of an official or department; or

(2) an individual holding a strictly confidential relation to the employing officer.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1116 (H.B. 1043), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 672.003. FEDERAL LAW AND GRANTS. To the extent that this chapter conflicts with federal law or a limitation provided by a federal grant to a state agency, this chapter shall be construed to operate in harmony with the federal law or limitation of the federal grant.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1116 (H.B. 1043), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 672.004. COMPLAINT REGARDING EMPLOYMENT DECISION OF STATE AGENCY. (a) An individual entitled to an employment preference under this chapter who is aggrieved by a decision of a state agency to which this chapter applies relating to hiring the individual, or relating to retaining the individual if the state agency reduces its workforce, may appeal the decision by filing a written complaint with the governing body of the state agency under this section.

(b) The governing body of a state agency that receives a written complaint under Subsection (a) shall respond to the complaint not later than the 15th business day after the date the governing body receives the complaint. The governing body may render a different hiring decision than the decision that is the subject of the complaint if the governing body determines that the employment preference under this chapter was not applied.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1116 (H.B. 1043), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 672.005. AGE LIMIT. An individual is entitled to an employment preference under this chapter only if the individual is 25 years of age or younger.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1116 (H.B. 1043), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2009.